Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.920

Construction as to Article 7 of Title 62A RCW.

Nothing in this chapter, with the exception of RCW 22.09.290(1)(b), shall be deemed to repeal, amend, or modify Article 7 of Title 62A RCW.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 23; 1963 c 124 s 59.]